Hawaii statutes.
§200-25 Fines and penalties.
Any person violating this part, or any rule adopted pursuant to this part,
shall be fined not less than $50 and not more than $1,000 or sentenced to a
term of imprisonment of not more than thirty days, or both, for each violation;
provided that in addition to, or as a condition to the suspension of, the fines
and penalties, the environmental court may deprive the offender of the
privilege of operating any vessel, including but not limited to any thrill
craft or vessel engaged in parasailing or water sledding, in the waters of the
State for a period of not more than thirty days. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L
1997, c 204, §2; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next